Washington statutes.
RCW 10.19.140

Return of bond to surety, when.

If a forfeiture has been entered against a person in a criminal case and the person is returned to custody or produced in court within twelve months from the forfeiture, then the full amount of the bond, less any and all costs determined by the court to have been incurred by law enforcement in transporting, locating, apprehending, or processing the return of the person to the jurisdiction of the court, shall be remitted to the surety if the surety was directly responsible for producing the person in court or directly responsible for apprehension of the person by law enforcement.

[ 1986 c 322 s 3.]

NOTES:

Severability—1986 c 322: See note following RCW 10.19.090.